Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 4

Schedule of Fees [Repealed]

43-19-401. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 43-19-401 — 43-19-404, (Acts 1976, ch. 691, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 43-2136 — 43-2139), concerning fee schedules for the sale of tobacco, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 66, § 1, effective April 15, 2009.

43-19-402. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 43-19-401 — 43-19-404, (Acts 1976, ch. 691, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 43-2136 — 43-2139), concerning fee schedules for the sale of tobacco, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 66, § 1, effective April 15, 2009.

43-19-403. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 43-19-401 — 43-19-404, (Acts 1976, ch. 691, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 43-2136 — 43-2139), concerning fee schedules for the sale of tobacco, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 66, § 1, effective April 15, 2009.

43-19-404. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 43-19-401 — 43-19-404, (Acts 1976, ch. 691, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., §§ 43-2136 — 43-2139), concerning fee schedules for the sale of tobacco, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 66, § 1, effective April 15, 2009.